code/xfst/tr-nom-example/tr-phon.xfst
!
! COGS 532 Theoretical Linguistics
!
! Umut Özge
! METU Informatics
!

clear

! Sound abstractions
! A : e a
! H : ı i u ü
! I : ı i
! N : n 0 
! Y : y 0
! S : s 0
! D : d t

define VAbs H|I|A; 
define CAbs S|D|Y|N;


! Consonants
define C  b|c|ç|d|f|g|ğ|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|r|s|ş|t|v|y|z;

! Consonant features
define -VOICE p|ç|t|k|f|s|ş|h;

! Vowels
define V  a|e|i|o|u|ü|ö|ı;
define V2 V|H|A;

! Orthographic symbols -- all symbols that can appear in words; we omit capitalization.
define O  [C | V];

! Vowel features
define +HIGH i|u|ı|ü; 
define -HIGH e|a|o|ö;
define +LOW a|ö;
define -LOW e|i|ı|o|u|ü;
define +BACK ı|a|o|u;
define -BACK i|e|ö|ü;
define +ROUND ö|ü|o|u;
define -ROUND e|a|i|ı;

define ConsAlter	 	S -> s || V _ ,, S -> 0 || \V _ ,,
						N -> 0 || _ .#. ,, N -> n || _ ? ,,
				 		Y -> 0 || ~[V|H|A] _ ,, Y -> y || [V|H|A] _ ,, 
						D -> t || %-VOICE _ ,, D -> d || \%-VOICE _ ; 

define ARule  	A -> %-HIGH & %-ROUND & %+BACK || %+BACK \V* _ ,,
				A -> %-HIGH & %-ROUND & %-BACK || %-BACK \V* _ ; 

define HRule  		H -> %+HIGH & %+ROUND & %+BACK || [%+BACK & %+ROUND] \V* _ ,,
         			H -> %+HIGH & %+ROUND & %-BACK || [%-BACK & %+ROUND] \V* _ ,,
          			H -> %+HIGH & %-ROUND & %+BACK || [%+BACK & %-ROUND] \V* _ ,,
          			H -> %+HIGH & %-ROUND & %-BACK || [%-BACK & %-ROUND] \V* _ ; 

define RemMorphBound	[\%^* %^:0 \%^*]*;

push RemMorphBound
push ConsAlter
push HRule
push ARule
read lexc tr-nom-example-v3.lexc
compose net
